California statutes. Education Code
(Date, giving month, day, and year.) This bond is registered pursuant to the statute in such cases made and provided in the name of (insert name of owner) and the interest and principal thereof are hereafter payable to
 the owner.Treasurer (or other officer)

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15193.

After any bond has been registered as provided in this article, the principal and interest of the bond shall be payable to the registered owner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15194.

The treasurer or other officer shall keep in his or her office a book or books which shall at all times show what bonds are registered and in whose name respectively.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Cancellation of Unsold Bonds [15200. - 15205.]

15200.

If any bonds authorized under the provisions of Sections 15100 and 15102, and Sections 15107 to 15140, inclusive, and Sections 15142 to 15261, inclusive, have not been offered for sale for one year from the date of the election at which they were authorized or remain unsold for a period of six months after having been offered for sale in the manner prescribed by the board of supervisors, the governing board of the district, for which the bonds were authorized, may petition the board of supervisors that has jurisdiction of the issuance and sale of the bonds to cause the unsold bonds to be canceled.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15201.

Upon receiving the petition, signed by a majority of the members of the governing board, the board of supervisors shall fix a time for hearing it, which shall not be more than 30 days after receipt of the petition, and shall cause a notice stating the time and place of the hearing, and the object of the petition in general terms, to be published for 10 days prior to the hearing, in a newspaper published in the school district or community college district, if there is one, and if there is no newspaper published in the school district, in a newspaper published at the county seat of the county.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15202.

At the time and place designated in the notice, or at any subsequent time to which the hearing may be postponed, the board of supervisors shall hear any reasons that may be submitted for or against the granting of the petition.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15203.

If the board of supervisors deem it for the best interests of the school district or community college district named in the petition that the unsold bonds be canceled, it shall make and enter an order in the minutes of its proceedings that the unsold bonds be canceled. Upon the entry of the order the bonds and the vote by which they were authorized to be issued shall cease to be of any validity.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15204.

The governing board of any school district or community college district may petition the board of supervisors to cancel the remaining authorization of that district to issue and sell bonds resulting from any particular school bond election after the sale of at least 90 percent of the bonds authorized at the election if the amount of the remaining authorization is not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and in the opinion of the governing board the sale of the remaining bonds would not be economically justified. Sections 15201 and 15202 shall be applicable and at or following, the hearing provided in Section 15201 and 15202, the board of supervisors, if it determines that the public interest will be served thereby, may make and enter an order in the minutes of its proceedings that the remaining authorization be canceled. Upon the entry of the order the vote by which the remaining authorization was created shall cease to be of any validity with respect to the remaining authorization.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15205.

For any bonds authorized at a school district election on November 5, 1991, and thereafter cancelled pursuant to this article without having been issued, the board of supervisors may order the cancellation annulled upon a finding that the issuance of the bonds is in the best interest of the district. Upon such order the district shall have the authority to issue the bonds pursuant to all of the terms and limitations of the original authorization, including the purposes for which such bonds may be issued, the maximum interest rate, and the maximum term to maturity, provided that the aggregate amount of bonds issued pursuant to such authorization does not exceed the amount originally authorized by the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 667, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Purchase of Bonds by Issuing School Districts and Community College Districts [15220. - 15221.]

15220.

The governing board of a school district or community college district may purchase in the open market bonds issued by the district. The cost of bonds purchased may be paid out of any funds of the district not required by law to be set aside for teachers’ salaries.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15221.

When any bonds issued by a district have been purchased by the governing board of the district, the bonds shall be deemed canceled and of no further validity. The governing board of the district shall immediately, after purchasing the bonds, notify the board of supervisors of its action, describing the bonds purchased. At its first meeting thereafter the board of supervisors shall note the purchase and cancellation of the bonds in the minutes of its proceedings.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Method of Bond Payment [15230. - 15235.]

15230.

The board of supervisors by an order entered upon its minutes shall fix the time when the whole or any part of the principal of the bonds shall be payable, which shall not be more than 25 years from the date of the bonds. If the governing board of the district has prescribed in its resolution the time or times when the whole or any part of the bonds shall be payable, the times and amounts shall be fixed by the order of the board of supervisors.

Any bonds authorized at an election held after September 15, 1945, may be issued subject to call and redemption before maturity at the option of the governing board of the district. The governing board may include in its resolution a requirement that all or any part of such bonds shall be issued subject to call and redemption before maturity and the price or prices at which the bonds shall be redeemed. The board of supervisors, in its order fixing the form of the bonds and the maturities thereof, shall provide that the bonds be redeemable at the option of the governing board and at the price or prices fixed in the resolution. Bonds issued subject to call and redemption prior to maturity shall contain a recital to that effect, and no bond shall be subject to call or redemption prior to maturity unless it contains that recital. The board of supervisors in its order shall fix the method of giving notice of redemption to holders of bonds to be redeemed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15231.

The board of supervisors at the direction of governing board of the district may divide the principal amount of bonds authorized at any election into two or more series and may fix different dates for the bonds of each series, in which event the maximum maturity date of the bonds shall be calculated from the date of each series respectively. When the issuance of bonds shall have been authorized pursuant to two or more propositions submitted at the same or different elections, all or any part of the bonds not theretofore issued may be combined and issued and sold as one or more series.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15232.

The board of supervisors may make the principal and interest of the bonds payable at the office of the treasurer of the county, or at any other place within the United States, including any office of a trustee or paying agent, which the board may designate, or at the office of the county treasurer, or at any other designated place at the option of the bondholder. The place of payment shall be specified in the bonds. The expense of paying the bonds elsewhere than at the office of the treasurer shall be a proper charge against the district to be paid out of the tax levied and collected for the payment of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 176, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

15233.

(a) The principal and interest on the bonds shall be paid by the county treasurer of the county, the superintendent of schools of which has jurisdiction of the district in behalf of which the bonds were issued, at the place required by the terms of the bonds, upon presentation and surrender of warrants drawn by the county auditor in payment thereof, after he or she has canceled the bonds and coupons, or upon the receipt of the registered owner, if the bonds are registered, after a proper warrant has been drawn by the auditor, out of the fund provided for their payment.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the board of supervisors has designated the office of a trustee or paying agent as the place for payment of the principal and interest of the bonds, then upon receipt of moneys representing the principal and interest on those bonds, the trustee or paying agent shall be responsible for the actual payment to the bondholders and cancellation of any bonds or coupons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 176, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

15234.

Any money remaining in the interest and sinking fund of any district after the payment of all bonds and coupons payable from the fund, or any money in excess of an amount sufficient to pay all unpaid bonds and coupons payable from the fund, shall be transferred to the general fund of the district upon the order of the auditor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15235.

Any money paid into the county treasury of the county and credited to the interest and sinking fund of any district remaining after the payment of all bonds and coupons payable from the fund, or which is in excess of an amount sufficient to pay all unpaid bonds and coupons payable from the fund, shall be transferred to the special reserve fund of the school district, or designated building fund of the community college district upon the order of the auditor, and may be used only for the purpose specified in Section 42840 or in accordance with the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual and for no other purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 89, Sec. 5.   (AB 2081)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Tax for Payment of Bonds [15250. - 15254.]

15250.

The board of supervisors of the county, the superintendent of schools of which has jurisdiction over any district, shall annually at the time of making the levy of taxes for county purposes, levy a tax for that year upon the property in the district for the interest and redemption of all outstanding bonds of the district. The tax shall not be less than sufficient to pay the interest on the bonds as it becomes due and to provide a sinking fund for the payment of the principal on or before maturity and may include an allowance for an annual reserve, established for the purpose of avoiding fluctuating tax levies. The tax shall be sufficient to provide funds for the payment of the interest on the bonds as it becomes due and also any part of the principal and interest that is to become due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the time for making the next general tax levy may be made available for the payment of the principal and interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15251.

(a) When collected, all taxes levied shall be paid into the county treasury of the county whose superintendent of schools has jurisdiction over the school district on behalf of which the tax was levied, to the credit of the interest and sinking fund of the school
 district, or community college district as designated by the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual, and shall be used for the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds and for no other purpose.

(b) Bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be secured by a statutory lien on all revenues received pursuant to the levy and collection of the tax. The lien shall automatically attach without further action or authorization by the governing board of the school district or community college district. The lien shall be valid and binding from the time the bonds are executed and delivered. The revenues received pursuant to the levy and collection of the tax shall be immediately subject to the lien, and the lien shall automatically attach to the revenues and be effective, binding, and enforceable against the school district or
 community college district, its successors, transferees, and creditors, and all others asserting rights therein, irrespective of whether those parties have notice of the lien and without the need for any physical delivery, recordation, filing, or further act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 78, Sec. 1.   (SB 222)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

15252.

The board of supervisors of the county, the superintendent of schools which has jurisdiction over any school district, shall annually at the time of making the levy of taxes for county purposes estimate the amount of money required to meet the payment of the principal and interest on bonds of the district authorized by the electors of the district and not sold, and which the governing board of the district informs the board in their belief will be sold before the next tax levy, and the board of supervisors shall levy a tax sufficient to pay the principal and interest so estimated.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15253.

If the bonds are declared invalid or are not issued for any reason, the tax levied and collected shall, if the school district or community college district has other bonds outstanding, be retained in the interest and sinking fund of the district to meet the interest and principal falling due on the bonds. If the district has no bonds outstanding the proceeds of the tax levy shall be transferred to the general fund of the district on the order of the auditor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15254.

This article shall apply only to bonds of a school district or community college district which were approved by the electors prior to July 1, 1978, and to bonded indebtedness for the acquisition or improvement of real property approved by two-thirds of the voters on or after June 4, 1986.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Tax for Payment of Bonds of School District or Community College District Located in Two or More Counties [15260. - 15262.]

15260.

In case of a district lying in two or more counties, the assessor of each of the counties in which the district lies, shall annually as soon as the county assessments have been equalized by the State Board of Equalization, certify to the board of supervisors of each of the counties in which any portion of the district is situated, the assessed value of all taxable property in the county situated in the school district or community college district. The tax shall be levied according to the ratio which the assessed value of the property in the district in any county bears to the total assessed value of the property in the district. Each board of supervisors shall levy upon the property of the district and within its own county the rate of tax that will be sufficient to raise not less than the amount needed to pay the interest and any portion of the principal of the bonds that is to become due during the year.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15261.

The tax shall be entered upon the assessment roll and collected in the same manner as other school taxes.

The tax when collected shall be paid into the county treasury of the county. The treasurer of any county, other than the one whose superintendent of schools has jurisdiction over the school, shall, upon order of the county auditor, pay the sum collected on account of the tax into the treasury of the county whose superintendent of schools has jurisdiction over the school.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15262.

This article shall apply only to bonds of a school district which were approved by the electors prior to July 1, 1978, and to bonded indebtedness for the acquisition or improvement of real property approved by two-thirds of the voters on or after June 4, 1986.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Strict Accountability in Local School Construction Bonds Act of 2000 [15264. - 15288.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [15264. - 15276.]

15264.

It is the intent of the Legislature that all of the following are realized:

(a) Vigorous efforts are undertaken to ensure that the expenditure of bond measures, including those authorized pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, are in strict conformity with the law.

(b) Taxpayers directly participate in the oversight of bond expenditures. 

(c) The members of the oversight committees appointed pursuant to this chapter promptly alert the public to any waste or improper expenditure of school construction bond money.

(d) That unauthorized expenditures of school construction bond revenues are vigorously investigated, prosecuted, and that the courts act swiftly to restrain any improper expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 44, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

15266.

(a) As an alternative to authorizing and issuing bonds pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15100) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15300), the governing board of a school district, community college district, or a school facilities improvement district may decide, pursuant to a two-thirds vote and subject to Section 15100 to pursue the authorization and issuance of bonds pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and subdivision (b) of Section 18 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. An election may only be ordered on the question of whether bonds of a school district, community college district, or a school facilities improvement district shall be issued and sold pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 18 of Article XVI of the California Constitution at a primary or general election, a regularly scheduled local election at which all of the electors of the school district, community college district, or school facilities improvement district, as appropriate, are entitled to vote, or a statewide special election.

(b) Upon adopting a resolution to incur bonded indebtedness pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 18 of Article XVI of the California Constitution and after the question has been submitted to the voters, if approved at the election, the bonds shall be issued pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and this chapter, and the governing board may not, regardless of the number of votes cast in favor of the bond, subsequently proceed exclusively under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15100) or under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15300), as appropriate. Where not inconsistent, the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15100) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15300), as appropriate, shall apply to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15267.

(a) Two or more small school districts that have had the issuance of bonds authorized by the voters pursuant to this chapter may form a joint powers authority in accordance with the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for the purpose of issuing or selling those bonds for raising money for the purposes authorized.

(b) A joint powers authority described in subdivision (a) shall be deemed a school district for purposes of this chapter only and may exercise all authority granted to a school district under this chapter under the conditions imposed by this chapter for the issuance and sale of bonds.

(c) Each small school district shall be responsible for its respective voter-approved bonds pursuant to this chapter. A joint powers authority formed pursuant to this section shall serve the purpose of sharing administrative costs associated with the issuance and sale of bonds and shall not otherwise affect the terms of the respective voter-approved bonds.

(d) For purposes of this section, “small school district” means a school district with fewer than 2,501 units of average daily attendance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 451, Sec. 2.   (AB 1550)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

15268.

The total amount of bonds issued, including bonds issued pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15100), shall not exceed 1.25 percent of the taxable property of the district as shown by the last equalized assessment of the county or counties in which the district is located. The bonds may only be issued if the tax rate levied to meet the requirements of Section 18 of Article XVI of the California Constitution in the case of indebtedness incurred by a school district pursuant to this chapter, at a single election, would not exceed thirty dollars ($30) per year per one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of taxable property when assessed valuation is projected by the district to increase in accordance with Article XIIIA of the California Constitution. For purposes of this section, the taxable property of a district for any fiscal year shall be calculated to include, but not be limited to, the assessed value of all unitary and operating nonunitary property of the district, which shall be derived by dividing the gross assessed value of the unitary and operating nonunitary property within the district for the 1987–88 fiscal year by the gross assessed value of all unitary and operating nonunitary property within the county in which the district is located for the 1987–88 fiscal year, and multiplying that result by the gross assessed value of all unitary and operating nonunitary property of the county on the last equalized assessment roll.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 44) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 580, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

15270.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 15102 and 15268, any unified school district may issue bonds pursuant to this article that, in aggregation with bonds issued pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15100), may not exceed 2.5 percent of the taxable property of the district as shown by the last equalized assessment of the county or counties in which the district is located. The bonds may only be issued if the tax rate levied to meet the requirements of Section 18 of Article XVI of the California Constitution in the case of indebtedness incurred pursuant to this chapter at a single election, by a unified school district, would not exceed sixty dollars ($60) per year per one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of taxable property when assessed valuation is projected by the district to increase in accordance with Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 15102 and 15268, any community college district may issue bonds pursuant to this article that, in aggregation with bonds issued pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15100), may not exceed 2.5 percent of the taxable property of the district as shown by the last equalized assessment of the county or counties in which the district is located. The bonds may only be issued if the tax rate levied to meet the requirements of Section 18 of Article XVI of the California Constitution in the case of indebtedness incurred pursuant to this chapter at a single election, by a community college district, would not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) per year per one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of taxable property when assessed valuation is projected by the district to increase in accordance with Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(c) In computing the outstanding bonded indebtedness of any unified school district or community college district for all purposes of this section, any outstanding bonds shall be deemed to have been issued for elementary school purposes, high school purposes, and community college purposes, respectively, in the respective amounts that the proceeds of the sale of those outstanding bonds, excluding any premium and accrued interest received on that sale, were or have been allocated by the governing board of the unified school district or community college district to each of those purposes respectively.

(d) For purposes of this section, the taxable property of a district for any fiscal year shall be calculated to include, but not be limited to, the assessed value of all unitary and operating nonunitary property of the district, which shall be derived by dividing the gross assessed value of the unitary and operating nonunitary property within the district for the 1987–88 fiscal year by the gross assessed value of all unitary and operating nonunitary property within the county in which the district is located for the 1987–88 fiscal year, and multiplying the result by the gross assessed value of all unitary and operating nonunitary property of the county on the last equalized assessment roll. In the event of the unification of two or more school districts subsequent to the 1987–88 fiscal year, the assessed value of all unitary and operating nonunitary property of the unified district shall be deemed to be the total of the assessed value of the taxable property of each of the unifying districts as that assessed value would be determined under Section 15268.

(e) For the purposes of this article, “general obligation bonds,” as that term is used in Section 18 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, means bonds of a school district or community college district the repayment of which is provided for by this chapter and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15100) of Part 10, and includes bonds of a school facilities improvement district the repayment of which is provided for by this chapter and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15300).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 132, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

15271.

The governing board of a school district or community college district may proceed pursuant to this chapter on behalf of a school facilities improvement district that is created by and under the exclusive authority of the school district or community college district and act on behalf of the school facilities district as provided pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15300).

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 132, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

15272.

In addition to the ballot requirements of Section 15122 and the ballot provisions of this code applicable to governing board member elections, for bond measures pursuant to this chapter, the ballot shall also be printed with a statement that the board will appoint a citizens’ oversight committee and conduct annual independent audits to assure that funds are spent only on school and classroom improvements and for no other purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 44, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

15274.

If it appears from the certificate of election results that 55 percent of the votes cast on the proposition of issuing bonds pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 18 of Article XVI of the California Constitution are in favor of issuing bonds, the governing board shall cause an entry of that fact to be made upon its minutes. The governing board shall then certify to the board of supervisors of the county whose superintendent of schools has jurisdiction over the district, all proceedings had in the premises. The county superintendent of schools shall send a copy of the certificate of election results to the board of supervisors of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 44, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

15276.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county board of education may not order an election to determine whether bonds may be issued under this article to raise funds for a county office of education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 44, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Citizens’ Oversight Committee [15278. - 15282.]

15278.

(a) If a bond measure authorized pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and subdivision (b) of Section 18 of Article XVI of the California Constitution is approved, the governing board of the school district or community college shall establish and appoint members to an independent citizens’ oversight committee, pursuant to Section 15282, within 60 days of the date that the governing board enters the election results on its minutes pursuant to Section 15274.

(b) The purpose of the citizens’ oversight committee shall be to inform the public concerning the expenditure of bond revenues. The citizens’ oversight committee shall actively review and report on the proper expenditure of taxpayers’ money for school construction. The citizens’ oversight committee shall advise the public as to whether a school district or community college district is in compliance with the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution. The citizens’ oversight committee shall convene to provide oversight for, but not be limited to, both of the following:

(1) Ensuring that bond revenues are expended only for the purposes described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(2) Ensuring that, as prohibited by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, no funds are used for any teacher or administrative salaries or other school operating expenses.

(c) In furtherance of its purpose, the citizens’ oversight committee may engage in any of the following activities:

(1) Receiving and reviewing copies of the annual, independent performance audit required by subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(2) Receiving and reviewing copies of the annual, independent financial audit required by subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(3) Inspecting school facilities and grounds to ensure that bond revenues are expended in compliance with the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(4) Receiving and reviewing copies of any deferred maintenance proposals or plans developed by a school district or community college district, including any reports required by Section 17584.1.

(5) Reviewing efforts by the school district or community college district to maximize bond revenues by implementing cost-saving measures, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Mechanisms designed to reduce the costs of professional fees.

(B) Mechanisms designed to reduce the costs of site preparation.

(C) Recommendations regarding the joint use of core facilities.

(D) Mechanisms designed to reduce costs by incorporating efficiencies in schoolsite design.

(E) Recommendations regarding the use of cost-effective and efficient reusable facility plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 44, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

15280.

(a) (1) The governing board of the district shall, without expending bond funds, provide the citizens’ oversight committee with any necessary technical assistance and shall provide administrative assistance in furtherance of its purpose and sufficient resources to publicize the conclusions of the citizens’ oversight committee.

(2) The governing board of the district shall provide the citizens’ oversight committee with responses to any and all findings, recommendations, and concerns addressed in the annual, independent financial and performance audits required by subparagraphs (C) and (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section
 1 of Article XIII A of the California Constitution within three months of receiving the audits.

(b) All citizens’ oversight committee proceedings shall be open to the public and notice to the public shall be provided in the same manner as the proceedings of the governing board of the district. The citizens’ oversight committee shall issue regular reports on the results of its activities. A report shall be issued at least once a year. Minutes of the proceedings of the citizens’ oversight committee and all documents received and reports issued shall be a matter of public record and be made available on an Internet Web site maintained by the governing board of
 the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 91, Sec. 1.   (SB 581)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

15282.

(a) The citizens’ oversight committee shall consist of at least seven members who shall serve for a minimum term of two years without compensation and for no more than three consecutive terms. While consisting of a minimum of at least seven members, the citizens’ oversight committee shall be comprised, as follows:

(1) One member shall be active in a business organization representing the business community located within the school district or community college district.

(2) One member shall be active in a senior citizens’ organization.

(3) One member shall be active in a bona fide taxpayers’ organization.

(4) For a school district, one member shall be the parent or guardian of a child enrolled in the school district. For a community college district, one member shall be a student who is both currently enrolled in the community college district and active in a community college group, such as student government. The community college student member may, at the discretion of the governing board of the community college district, serve up to six months after his or her graduation.

(5) For a school district, one member shall be both a parent or guardian of a child enrolled in the school district and active in a parent-teacher organization, such as the Parent Teacher Association or schoolsite council. For a community college district, one member shall be active in the support and organization of a community college or the community colleges of the district, such as a member of an advisory
 council or foundation.

(b) An employee or official of the school district or community college district shall not be appointed to the citizens’ oversight committee. A vendor, contractor, or consultant of the school district or community college district shall not be appointed to the citizens’ oversight committee. Members of the citizens’ oversight committee shall, pursuant to Sections 35233 and 72533, abide by the prohibitions contained in Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090) and Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 1125) of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 27.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Bond Accountability [15284. - 15288.]

15284.

(a) An action to obtain an order restraining and preventing any expenditure of funds received by a school district or community college district through the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and subdivision (b) of Section 18 of Article XVI of the California Constitution may be maintained against any officer, agent, or other person acting on behalf of, that school district or community college district, by a citizen residing in the school or community college district who is assessed and is liable to pay an ad valorem tax on real property within the school or community college district, or who has paid an ad valorem tax on real property within the school or community college district within one year before the commencement of the action if it appears by the complaint or affidavits that any of the following conditions are present:
